Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1517.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; barbering and cosmetology board; salary and operational costs A. The sum of $235,500 and three FTE positions are appropriated from the barbering and cosmetology fund established by section 32-505, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the barbering and cosmetology board for salaries and operational costs. B. The barbering and cosmetology board shall fill three FTE positions with the following staff: 1. One licensing specialist. 2. One customer service representative. 3. One quality assurance specialist.